California statutes. Labor Code
(a) (1) Any order or award for payment of a lien filed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4903 shall be made for payment only to the person who was entitled to payment for the expenses as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 4903 at the time the expenses were incurred, who is the lien owner, and not to an assignee unless the person has ceased doing business in the capacity held at the time the expenses were incurred and has assigned all right, title, and interest in the remaining accounts receivable to the assignee.

(2) All liens filed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4903 shall be filed in the name of the lien owner only, and no payment shall be made to any lien claimant without evidence that he or she is the owner of that
 lien.

(3) Paragraph (1) does not apply to an assignment that was completed prior to January 1, 2013, or that was required by a contract that became enforceable and irrevocable prior to January 1, 2013. This paragraph is declarative of existing law.

(4) For liens filed after January 1, 2017, the lien shall not be assigned unless the person has ceased doing business in the capacity held at the time the expenses were incurred and has assigned all right, title, and interest in the remaining accounts receivable to the assignee. The assignment of a lien, in violation of this paragraph is invalid by operation of law.

(b) If there has been an assignment of a lien, either as an assignment of all right, title, and interest in the accounts receivable or as an assignment for collection, a true and correct copy of the assignment
 shall be filed and served.

(1) If the lien is filed on or after January 1, 2013, and the assignment occurs before the filing of the lien, the copy of the assignment shall be served at the time the lien is filed.

(2) If the lien is filed on or after January 1, 2013, and the assignment occurs after the filing of the lien, the copy of the assignment shall be served within 20 days of the date of the assignment.

(3) If the lien is filed before January 1, 2013, the copy of the assignment shall be served by January 1, 2014, or with the filing of a declaration of readiness or at the time of a lien hearing, whichever is earliest.

(c) If there has been more than one assignment of the same receivable or bill, the appeals board may set the matter for hearing on
 whether the multiple assignments constitute bad-faith actions or tactics that are frivolous, harassing, or intended to cause unnecessary delay or expense. If so found by the appeals board, appropriate sanctions, including costs and attorney’s fees, may be awarded against the assignor, assignee, and their respective attorneys.

(d) At the time of filing of a lien on or after January 1, 2013, or in the case of a lien filed before January 1, 2013, at the earliest of the filing of a declaration of readiness, a lien hearing, or January 1, 2014, supporting documentation shall be filed including one or more declarations under penalty of perjury by a natural person or persons competent to testify to the facts stated, declaring both of the following:

(1) The services or products described in the bill for services or products were actually provided to the injured employee.

(2) The billing statement attached to the lien truly and accurately describes the services or products that were provided to the injured employee.

(e) A lien submitted for filing on or after January 1, 2013, for expenses provided in subdivision (b) of Section 4903, that does not comply with the requirements of this section shall be deemed to be invalid, whether or not accepted for filing by the appeals board, and shall not operate to preserve or extend any time limit for filing of the lien.

(f) This section shall take effect without regulatory action. The appeals board and the administrative director may promulgate regulations and forms for the implementation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 868, Sec. 9.   (SB 1160)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4904.

(a) If notice is given in writing to the insurer, or to the employer if uninsured, setting forth the nature and extent of any claim that is allowable as a lien in favor of the Employment Development Department, the claim is a lien against any amount thereafter payable as temporary or permanent disability compensation, subject to the determination of the amount and approval of the lien by the appeals board. When the Employment Development Department has served an insurer or employer with a lien claim, the insurer or employer shall notify the Employment Development Department, in writing, as soon as possible, but in no event later than 15 working days after commencing disability indemnity payments. When a lien has been served on an insurer or an employer by the Employment Development
 Department, the insurer or employer shall notify the Employment Development Department, in writing, within 10 working days of filing an application for adjudication, a stipulated award, or a compromise and release with the appeals board.

(b) (1) In determining the amount of lien to be allowed for unemployment compensation disability benefits under subdivision (f) of Section 4903, the appeals board shall allow the lien in the amount of benefits which it finds were paid for the same day or days of disability for which an award of compensation for any permanent disability indemnity resulting solely from the same injury or illness or temporary disability indemnity, or both, is made and for which the employer has not reimbursed the Employment Development Department pursuant to Section 2629.1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(2) In determining the amount of lien
 to be allowed for unemployment compensation benefits and extended duration benefits under subdivision (g) of Section 4903, the appeals board shall allow the lien in the amount of benefits which it finds were paid for the same day or days for which an award of compensation for temporary total disability is made.

(3) In determining the amount of lien to be allowed for family temporary disability insurance benefits under subdivision (h) of Section 4903, the appeals board shall allow the lien in the amount of benefits that it finds were paid for the same day or days for which an award of compensation for temporary total disability is made and for which the employer has not reimbursed the Employment Development Department pursuant to Section 2629.1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(c) In the case of agreements for the compromise and release of a disputed claim for compensation, the
 applicant and defendant may propose to the appeals board, as part of the compromise and release agreement, an amount out of the settlement to be paid to any lien claimant claiming under subdivision (f), (g), or (h) of Section 4903. If the lien claimant objects to the amount proposed for payment of its lien under a compromise and release settlement or stipulation, the appeals board shall determine the extent of the lien claimant’s entitlement to reimbursement on its lien and make and file findings on all facts involved in the controversy over this issue in accordance with Section 5313. The appeals board may approve a compromise and release agreement or stipulation which proposes the disallowance of a lien, in whole or in part, only where there is proof of service upon the lien claimant by the defendant, not less than 15 days prior to the appeals board action, of all medical and rehabilitation documents and a copy of the proposed compromise and release agreement or stipulation. The determination of the appeals
 board, subject to petition for reconsideration and to the right of judicial review, as to the amount of lien allowed under subdivision (f), (g), or (h) of Section 4903, whether in connection with an award of compensation or the approval of a compromise and release agreement, shall be binding on the lien claimant, the applicant, and the defendant, insofar as the right to benefits paid under the Unemployment Insurance Code for which the lien was claimed. The appeals board may order the amount of any lien claim, as determined and allowed by it, to be paid directly to the person entitled, either in a lump sum or in installments.

(d) Where unemployment compensation disability benefits, including family temporary disability insurance benefits, have been paid pursuant to the Unemployment Insurance Code while reconsideration of an order, decision, or award is pending, or has been granted, the appeals board shall determine and allow a final amount on
 the lien as of the date the board is ready to issue its decision denying a petition for reconsideration or affirming, rescinding, altering or amending the original findings, order, decision, or award.

(e) The appeals board shall not be prohibited from approving a compromise and release agreement on all other issues and deferring to subsequent proceedings the determination of a lien claimant’s entitlement to reimbursement if the defendant in any of these proceedings agrees to pay the amount subsequently determined to be due under the lien claim.

(f) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision are declaratory of existing law, and shall not constitute good cause to reopen, rescind, or amend any final order, decision, or award of the appeals board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 71.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4904.1.

The payment of liens as provided in Section 4904, shall in no way affect the commencement of immediate payments on any balance of the award to the injured claimant where an installment payment for his disability has been determined.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1241.)
-------------------------------------------

4905.

Except with regard to liens as permitted by subdivision (b) of Section 4903, if it appears in any proceeding pending before the appeals board that a lien should be allowed if it had been duly requested by the party entitled thereto, the appeals board may, without any request for such lien having been made, order the payment of the claim to be made directly to the person entitled, in the same manner and with the same effect as though the lien had been regularly requested, and the award to such person shall constitute a lien against unpaid compensation due at the time of service of the award.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 72.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4906.

(a) A charge, claim, or agreement for the legal services or disbursements mentioned in subdivision (a) of Section 4903, or for the expense mentioned in subdivision (b) of Section 4903, is not enforceable, valid, or binding in excess of a reasonable amount. The appeals board may determine what constitutes a reasonable amount, but payment pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4903 or Section 5710 shall not be allowed for any services or expenses incurred prior to the filing of the disclosure form described in subdivision (e) with the appeals board and the sending of that form to the employer, or to the insurer or third-party administrator,
 if either is known, by the attorney.

(b) An attorney or agent shall not demand or accept any fee from an employee or dependent of an employee for the purpose of representing the employee or dependent of an employee in any proceeding of the division, appeals board, or any appellate procedure related thereto until the amount of the fee has been approved or set by the appeals board.

(c) Any fee agreement shall be submitted to the appeals board for approval within 10 days after the agreement is made.

(d) In establishing a reasonable attorney’s fee, consideration shall be given to the responsibility assumed by the attorney, the care exercised in representing the applicant, the time involved, and the results obtained.

(e) At the initial consultation, an attorney shall furnish the employee a written disclosure form promulgated by the administrative director which shall clearly and prominently describe the procedures available to the injured employee or his or her dependents. The disclosure form shall describe this section, the range of attorney’s fees customarily approved by the appeals
 board, and the attorney’s fees provisions of Section 4064 and the extent to which an employee may receive compensation without incurring attorney’s fees. The disclosure form shall include the telephone number of the administrative director together with the statement that the employee may receive answers at that number to questions concerning entitlement to compensation or the procedures to follow to receive compensation. A copy of the disclosure form shall be signed by the employee and the attorney and filed with the appeals board and sent to the employer, or insurer or third-party administrator, if either is known, by the attorney within 15 days of the employee’s and attorney’s execution thereof.

(f) The disclosure form set forth in subdivision (e) shall contain, prominently stated, the following statement:
“Any person who makes or causes to be made any knowingly false or fraudulent material statement or representation for the purpose of obtaining or denying workers’ compensation benefits or payments is guilty of a felony.”
(g) (1) The disclosure form described in subdivision (e) shall also contain a paragraph setting forth the exact location of the district office of the appeals board at which the employee’s case will be filed. This paragraph shall also contain, prominently displayed, the following statement:
“The employee has been advised of the district office at which his or her case will be filed and that he or she may be required to
 attend conferences or hearings at this location at his or her own expense.”
(2) The disclosure form may not be signed by the employee until he or she has been advised of the location at which his or her case will be filed, has met with or personally spoken with an attorney licensed by the State Bar of California who is regularly employed by the firm by which the employee will be represented, and has been advised of his or her rights as set forth in subdivision (e) and the provisions of paragraph (1). The name of this individual shall be clearly and legibly set forth on the disclosure form.

(3) The disclosure form shall include the actual date the disclosure form was signed by both the employee and the attorney and shall be signed under
 penalty of perjury by the attorney representing the employee, or an attorney licensed by the State Bar of California who is regularly employed by his or her firm. A copy of the disclosure form containing all of the required information shall be given to the employee when he or she signs the disclosure form.

(h) In addition to the disclosure form, the employee, the insurer, the employer, and the attorneys for each party shall sign under penalty of perjury and file with the board a statement, with the complete application or answer, and in addition to the disclosure required pursuant to subdivision (g), that they have not violated Section 139.3 and that they have not offered, delivered, received, or accepted any rebate, refund, commission,
 preference, patronage dividend, discount, or other consideration, whether in the form of money or otherwise, as compensation or inducement for any referred examination or evaluation.

(i) An attorney who subsequently assumes the representation of the employee in the same action or proceeding shall complete a disclosure form that meets all of the requirements of this section and the statement required by subdivision (h). Both the form and the statement shall be signed under penalty of perjury by the attorney or an attorney licensed by the State Bar of California who is regularly employed by his or her firm. Both the disclosure form and the statement shall be filed with the appeals board and sent to the employer, or insurer or third-party administrator, if either is known, by the attorney within 15 days of the employee’s and attorney’s
 execution of the form and statement. Payment pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4903 or Section 5710 shall not be allowed for any services or expenses incurred prior to the filing of the disclosure form described in subdivision (e) with the appeals board and the sending of that form to the employer, or to the insurer or third-party administrator, if either is known, by the attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 852, Sec. 2.   (AB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4907.

(a) The privilege of any person, except attorneys admitted to practice in the Supreme Court of the state, to appear in any proceeding as a representative of any party before the appeals board, or any of its workers’ compensation administrative law judges, may, after a hearing, be removed, denied, or suspended by the appeals board for either of the following:

(1) For a violation of this chapter, the Rules of the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board, or the Rules of the Administrative Director.

(2) For other good cause, including, but not limited to, failure to pay final order of sanctions, attorney’s fees, or costs issued under Section 5813.

(b) For purposes of this section, nonattorney representatives shall be held to the same professional standards of conduct as attorneys.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 73.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4908.

A claim for compensation for the injury or death of any employee, or any award or judgment entered thereon, has the same preference over the other debts of the employer, or his estate and of the insurer which is given by the law to claims for wages. Such preference is for the entire amount of the compensation to be paid. This section shall not impair the lien of any previous award.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 649.)
-------------------------------------------

4909.

Any payment, allowance, or benefit received by the injured employee during the period of his incapacity, or by his dependents in the event of his death, which by the terms of this division was not then due and payable or when there is any dispute or question concerning the right to compensation, shall not, in the absence of any agreement, be an admission of liability for compensation on the part of the employer, but any such payment, allowance, or benefit may be taken into account by the appeals board in fixing the amount of the compensation to be paid. The acceptance of any such payment, allowance, or benefit shall not operate as a waiver of any right or claim which the employee or his dependents has against the employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

4909.1.

Authorized representatives of the Department of Corrections, and the Department of the Youth Authority may request the State Compensation Insurance Fund to provide any payment, allowance, or benefit as described in Section 4909. When requested by an authorized representative, the State Compensation Insurance Fund shall administer the benefits in a timely fashion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1233, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Compromise and Release [5000. - 5006.]

5000.

No contract, rule, or regulation shall exempt the employer from liability for the compensation fixed by this division, but nothing in this division shall:

(a) Impair the right of the parties interested to compromise, subject to the provisions herein contained, any liability which is claimed to exist under this division on account of injury or death.

(b) Confer upon the dependents of any injured employee any interest which the employee may not release by compromise or for which he, or his estate is in the event of such compromise by him accountable to dependents.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

5001.

Compensation is the measure of the responsibility which the employer has assumed for injuries or deaths which occur to employees in his employment when subject to this division. No release of liability or compromise agreement is valid unless it is approved by the appeals board or referee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5002.

A copy of the release or compromise agreement signed by both parties shall forthwith be filed with the appeals board. Upon filing with and approval by the appeals board, it may, without notice, of its own motion or on the application of either party, enter its award based upon the release or compromise agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.

Every release or compromise agreement shall be in writing and duly executed, and the signature of the employee or other beneficiary shall be attested by two disinterested witnesses or acknowledged before a notary public. The document shall specify:

(a) The date of the accident.

(b) The average weekly wages of the employee, determined according to Chapter 1 of Part 2 of this division.

(c) The nature of the disability, whether total or partial, permanent or temporary.

(d) The amount paid, or due and unpaid, to the employee up to the date of the release or agreement or death, and the amount of the payment or benefits then or thereafter to be made.

(e) The length of time such payment or benefit is to continue.

(f) In the event a claim of lien under subdivision (f) or (g) of Section 4903 has been filed, the number of days and the amount of temporary disability indemnity which should be allowed to the lien claimant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1721.)
-------------------------------------------

5004.

In case of death there shall also be stated in the release or compromise agreement:

(a) The date of death.

(b) The name of the widow.

(c) The names and ages of all children.

(d) The names of all other dependents.

(e) Whether the dependents are total or partial.

(f) The amount paid or to be paid as a death benefit and to whom payment is to be made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

5005.

In any case involving a claim of occupational disease or cumulative injury, as set forth in Section 5500.5, the employee and any employer, or any insurance carrier for any employer, may enter into a compromise and release agreement settling either all or any part of the employee’s claim, including a part of his claim against any employer. Such compromise and release agreement, upon approval by the appeals board or a referee, shall be a total release as to such employer or insurance carrier for the portion or portions of the claim released, but shall not constitute a bar to a recovery from any one or all of the remaining employers or insurance carriers for the periods of exposure not so released.

In any case where a compromise and release agreement of a portion of a claim has been made and approved, the employee may elect to proceed as provided in Section 5500.5 against any one or more of the remaining employers, or against an employer for that portion of his exposure not so released; in any such proceeding after election following compromise and release, that portion of liability attributable to the portion or portions of the exposure so released shall be assessed and deducted from the liability of the remaining defendant or defendants, but any such defendant shall receive no credit for any moneys paid by way of compromise and release in excess of the liability actually assessed against the released employments and the employee shall not receive any further benefits from the released employments for any liability assessed to them above what was paid by way of compromise and release.

In approving a compromise and release agreement under this section, the appeals board or referee shall determine the adequacy of the compromise and release agreement as it shall then reflect the potential liability of the released exposure after apportionment, but need not make a final actual determination of the potential liability of the employer or employers for that portion of the exposure being released.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.

A determination of facts by the appeals board under this chapter has no collateral estoppel effect on a subsequent criminal prosecution and does not preclude litigation of those same facts in the criminal proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 158, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Lump Sum Payments [5100. - 5106.]

5100.

At the time of making its award, or at any time thereafter, the appeals board, on its own motion either upon notice, or upon application of either party with due notice to the other, may commute the compensation payable under this division to a lump sum and order it to be paid forthwith or at some future time if any of the following conditions appear:

(a) That such commutation is necessary for the protection of the person entitled thereto, or for the best interest of the applicant. In determining what is in the best interest of the applicant, the appeals board shall consider the general financial condition of the applicant, including but not limited to, the applicant’s ability to live without periodic indemnity payments and to discharge debts incurred prior to the date of injury.

(b) That commutation will avoid inequity and will not cause undue expense or hardship to the applicant.

(c) That the employer has sold or otherwise disposed of the greater part of his assets or is about to do so.

(d) That the employer is not a resident of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1015, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5100.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 5100, the appeals board shall not commute the compensation payable under this division to a lump sum when such compensation is payable under Section 4751 of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5100.6.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 5100, the appeals board shall not permit the commutation or settlement of prospective compensation or indemnity payments or other benefits to which the employee is entitled under vocational rehabilitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 524, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5101.

The amount of the lump sum shall be determined as follows:

(a) If the injury causes temporary disability, the appeals board shall estimate the probable duration thereof and the probable amount of the temporary disability payments therefor, in accordance with Chapter 2 of Part 2 of this division, and shall fix the lump sum at the amount so determined.

(b) If the injury causes permanent disability or death, the appeals board shall fix the total amount of the permanent disability payment or death benefit payable therefor in accordance with Chapter 2 of Part 2 of this division, and shall estimate the present value thereof, assuming interest at the rate of 3 percent per annum and disregarding the probability of the beneficiary’s death in all cases except where the percentage of permanent disability is such as to entitle the beneficiary to a life pension, and then taking into consideration the probability of the beneficiary’s death only in estimating the present value of such life pension.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5102.

The appeals board may order the lump sum paid directly to the injured employee or his dependents, or deposited with any savings bank or trust company authorized to transact business in this state, which agrees to accept the same as a deposit bearing interest; or the appeals board may order the lump sum deposited with the State Compensation Insurance Fund. Any lump sum so deposited, together with all interest derived therefrom, shall thereafter be held in trust for the injured employee, or in the event of his death, for his dependents. In the event of the employee’s death, his dependents shall have no further recourse against the employer under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5103.

Payments from the lump sum so deposited shall be made by the trustee only in the amounts and at the time fixed by order of the appeals board and until the lump sum and interest thereon are exhausted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5104.

In the appointment of the trustee, preference may be given to the choice of the injured employee or his dependents.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

5105.

Upon the payment of a lump sum, the employer shall present to the appeals board a proper receipt evidencing the same, executed either by the injured employee or his dependents, or by the trustee. The appeals board shall thereupon issue its certificate in proper form evidencing such payment. Such certificate, upon filing with the clerk of the superior court in which any judgment upon an award has been entered, operates as a satisfaction of the award and fully discharges the employer from any further liability on account thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5106.

The appeals board shall, upon the request of the Director of Industrial Relations, where the employer is uninsured and the installments of compensation awarded are to be paid in the future, determine the present worth of the future payments, discounted at the rate of 3 percent per annum, and order the present worth paid into the Uninsured Employers Fund, which fund shall thereafter pay to the beneficiaries of the award the future payments as they become due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 202, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3.5. ARBITRATION [5270. - 5278.]

5270.

This part shall not apply in cases where an injured employee or dependent is involved unless the employee or dependent is represented by an attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1550, Sec. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

5270.5.

(a) The presiding workers’ compensation judge at each district office shall prepare a list of all eligible attorneys who apply to be placed on the list of eligible arbitrators. Attorneys are eligible to become arbitrators if they are active members of the California State Bar Association and are one of the following:

(1) A certified specialist in workers’ compensation, or eligible to become certified.

(2) A retired workers’ compensation judge.

(3) A retired appeals board member.

(4) An attorney who has been certified to serve as a judge pro tempore.

(b) No attorney shall be included in a panel of arbitrators, if he or she has served as a judge in any proceeding involving the same case, or has represented, or whose firm has represented, any party in the same case.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 892, Sec. 44.)
-------------------------------------------

5271.

(a) The parties to a dispute submitted for arbitration may select any eligible attorney from the list prepared by the presiding workers’ compensation judge to serve as arbitrator. However, when the disputed issue involves insurance coverage, the parties may select any attorney as arbitrator upon agreement of the parties.

(b) If the parties cannot select an arbitrator by agreement, either party may request the presiding workers’ compensation judge to assign a panel of five arbitrators selected at random from the list of eligible attorneys. No more than three arbitrators on a five-member panel may be defense attorneys, no more than three may be applicant’s attorneys, and no more than two may be retired workers’ compensation judges or appeals board commissioners.

(c) For each party in excess of one party in the capacity of employer and one party in the capacity of injured employee or lien claimant, the presiding judge shall randomly select two additional arbitrators to add to the panel. For each additional party in the capacity of employer, the presiding judge shall assign a retired workers’ compensation judge or retired appeals board commissioner and an applicant’s attorney. For each additional party in the capacity of injured employee or lien claimant, the presiding judge shall assign a retired workers’ compensation judge or retired appeals board commissioner and a defense attorney. For each additional other party, the presiding judge shall assign two arbitrators to the panel, in order of rotation from case to case, as follows: a retired workers’ compensation judge or retired appeals board commissioner, an applicant’s attorney, a defense attorney.

(d) A party may petition the presiding workers’ compensation judge to remove a member from the panel pursuant to Section 170.1 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The presiding workers’ compensation judge shall assign another eligible attorney to replace any member removed under this subdivision.

(e) Each party or lien claimant shall strike two members from the panel, and the remaining attorney shall serve as arbitrator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1550, Sec. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

5272.

Arbitrators shall have all of the statutory and regulatory duties and responsibilities of a workers’ compensation judge, as set forth in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 5300) of Part 4, except for the following:

(a) Arbitrators shall have no power to order the injured worker to be examined by a qualified medical evaluator pursuant to Sections 5701 and 5703.5.

(b) Arbitrators shall not have power of contempt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1550, Sec. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

5273.

(a) In disputes between an employee and an employer, the employer shall pay all costs related to the arbitration proceeding, including use of facilities, hearing reporter per diems and transcript costs.

(b) In all other disputes, the costs of the arbitration proceedings, including the arbitrator’s compensation, shall be paid as follows:

(1) By the parties equally in any dispute between an employer and an insurer, or an employer and a lien claimant.

(2) By the parties equally in proceedings subject to Section 5500.5.

(3) By the dependents in accordance with their proportionate share of death benefits, where there is no dispute as to the injury causing death.

(c) Disputes regarding the costs or fees for arbitration shall be within the exclusive jurisdiction of the appeals board, and shall be determined initially by the presiding judge of the district office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1550, Sec. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

5275.

(a) Disputes involving the following issues shall be submitted for arbitration:

(1) Insurance coverage.

(2) Right of contribution in accordance with Section 5500.5.

(b) By agreement of the parties, any issue arising under Division 1 (commencing with Section 50) or Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) may be submitted for arbitration, regardless of the date of injury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 6, Sec. 70.5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5276.

(a) Arbitration proceedings may commence at any place and time agreed upon by all parties.

(b) If the parties cannot agree on a time or place to commence arbitration proceedings, the arbitrator shall order the date, time and place for commencement of the proceeding. Unless all parties agree otherwise, arbitration proceedings shall commence not less than 30 days nor more than 60 days from the date an arbitrator is selected.

(c) Ten days before the arbitration, each party shall submit to the arbitrator and serve on the opposing party reports, records and other documentary evidence on which that party intends to rely. If a party intends to rely upon excerpts of records or depositions, only copies of the excerpts shall be submitted to the arbitrator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 892, Sec. 44.)
-------------------------------------------

5277.

(a) The arbitrator’s findings and award shall be served on all parties within 30 days of submission of the case for decision.

(b) The arbitrator’s award shall comply with Section 5313 and shall be filed with the appeals board office pursuant to venue rules published by the appeals board.

(c) The findings of fact, award, order, or decision of the arbitrator shall have the same force and effect as an award, order, or decision of a workers’ compensation judge.

(d) Use of an arbitrator for any part of a proceeding or any issue shall not bind the parties to the use of the same arbitrator for any subsequent issues or proceedings.

(e) Unless all parties agree to a longer period of time, the failure of the arbitrator to submit the decision within 30 days shall result in forfeiture of the arbitrator’s fee and shall vacate the submission order and all stipulations.

(f) The presiding workers’ compensation judge may submit supplemental proceedings to arbitration pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 490.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5278.

(a) No disclosure of any offers of settlement made by any party shall be made to the arbitrator prior to the filing of the award.

(b) Article 7 (commencing with Section 11430.10) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code applies to a communication to the arbitrator or a potential arbitrator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 938, Sec. 75.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Operative July 1, 1997, by Sec. 98 of Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. COMPENSATION PROCEEDINGS [5300. - 6002.]



  CHAPTER 1. Jurisdiction [5300. - 5317.]

5300.

All the following proceedings shall be instituted before the appeals board and not elsewhere, except as otherwise provided in Division 4:

(a) For the recovery of compensation, or concerning any right or liability arising out of or incidental thereto.

(b) For the enforcement against the employer or an insurer of any liability for compensation imposed upon the employer by this division in favor of the injured employee, his or her dependents, or any third person.

(c) For the determination of any question as to the distribution of compensation among dependents or other persons.

(d) For the determination of any question as to who are dependents of any deceased employee, or what persons are entitled to any benefit under the compensation provisions of this division.

(e) For obtaining any order which by Division 4 the appeals board is authorized to make.

(f) For the determination of any other matter, jurisdiction over which is vested by Division 4 in the Division of Workers’ Compensation, including the administrative director and the appeals board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 152.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5301.

The appeals board is vested with full power, authority and jurisdiction to try and determine finally all the matters specified in Section 5300 subject only to the review by the courts as specified in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1513.)
-------------------------------------------

5302.
